Utah statutes.
17-21-2.   Seal.

The county recorder shall have a seal, to be furnished by the county legislative body, the impression of which shall contain the following words: "State of Utah, County Recorder," together with the name of the county in which the same is to be used.



Amended by Chapter 227, 1993 General Session

